Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 5. Transfers to Political Subdivisions.

Sec. 44.68.270.
Transfer of equipment to political subdivisions.

The commissioner of transportation and public facilities may transfer directly to a political subdivision of the state, including a village organized under 25 U.S.C. 461 — 479, the title to automotive and construction equipment that can be used in the maintenance or construction of roads and airports.

Equipment may not be transferred unless it is in excess of known state requirements in the major senatorial district and is intended for use, to some extent, to maintain and construct airports or roads.

The commissioner may transfer equipment that in the commissioner’s judgment is not economically repairable or is obsolete, without regard to (b) of this section.

The commissioner shall determine how the equipment is to be allocated in the best interests of the state. The commissioner may adopt necessary regulations to implement this section and AS

44.68.280

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 106 SLA 1962; am §§ 102 — 104 ch 59 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.74.070. Renumbered in 1989.

In 2004, the revisor deleted “or 48 U.S.C. 362” from subsection (a) because 48 U.S.C. 362 was transferred to 25 U.S.C. 473a and therefore falls within 25 U.S.C. 461 — 479, which is already referred to in subsection (a).

Sec. 44.68.280.
Restriction on sales by transferee.

A political subdivision that receives title to automotive and construction equipment may not sell it for a period of two years after the date title is transferred.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1962)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.74.080. Renumbered in 1989.

Sec. 44.68.290.
Transfer of civil defense property.

Title to personal property received by the state from the federal government for civil defense purposes may be transferred to political subdivisions of the state that have qualified civil defense organizations by the Department of Public Safety with the approval of the state director of civil defense and the approval of the Department of Administration. This section is applicable only when title to the property is held by the Department of Public Safety.

As a condition of title transfer, the political subdivision is responsible for compliance with the federal and state restrictions on the property.

A transfer of title to property may not be made if the transfer is not in compliance with federal law and with the terms of the agreement under which the property has been made available to the state by the federal government.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1965)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 44.74.090.
Renumbered in 1989.